Vermont, session 2025-2026, H750.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 4001 is amended to read:
§ 4001. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
VT LEG #385478 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.750
2026 Page 2 of 3
* * *
(6) “Education spending” means the amount of the school district
budget, any assessment for a joint contract school, career technical center
payments made on behalf of the district under subsection 1561(b) of this title,
and any amount added to pay a deficit pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 1523(b) that is
paid for by the school district, but excluding any portion of the school budget
paid for from any other sources such as endowments, parental fundraising,
federal funds, nongovernmental grants, or other State funds such as special
education funds paid under chapter 101 of this title.
(A) [Repealed.]
(B) For all bonds approved by voters prior to July 1, 2024, voter-
approved Voter-approved bond payments toward principal and interest shall
not be included in “education spending” for purposes of calculating excess
spending pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 5401(12).
* * *
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 3445(a)(5) is amended to read:
(5) Final approval for construction aid.
(A) Unless approved by the Secretary for good cause in advance of
commencement of construction, a school district shall not begin construction
before the Secretary approves a final application, provided that any school
district that commences construction before July 1, 2026, shall be deemed to
VT LEG #385478 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.750
2026 Page 3 of 3
have good cause. A school district may submit a written final application to
the Secretary at any time following approval of a preliminary application.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Sec. 1 (excess spending exclusion) and this section shall take effect on
passage.
(b) Sec. 2 (final approval for construction aid) shall take effect on July 1,
2026.
VT LEG #385478 v.4